Idaho, session 2025, S1166.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 65, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6540, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6540. RESTRICTIONS ON SITING OF HOMELESS SHELTERS. (1) In any city
with a population greater than one hundred thousand (100,000) according to
the most recent United States decennial census, no homeless shelter shall
be established, constructed, or operated within three hundred (300) feet
of the property line of any residentially zoned property as designated by
the applicable municipal or county zoning ordinance or of any property with
existing exclusive detached residential use. The distance specified in this
subsection shall be measured from the nearest property line of the proposed
homeless shelter to the nearest property line of any residentially zoned
property.
(2) For purposes of this section, "homeless shelter" means a facility,
whether publicly or privately operated, that provides temporary sleeping
accommodations to individuals or families who lack a fixed, regular, and
adequate nighttime residence. Additional services, including but not lim-
ited to food, hygiene support, counseling, and case management may also
be provided in conjunction with temporary sleeping accommodations. The
definition provided for in this subsection shall apply whether a facility
operates on a full-time, twenty-four (24) hour basis or on a part-time basis,
such as during nighttime hours only.
(3) The provisions of this section shall apply to new homeless shelters
seeking approval for construction, operation, or occupancy on and after the
effective date of this section. Existing homeless shelters that were oper-
ational prior to the effective date of this section will not be required to
relocate but shall be prohibited from expanding operations or capacity in a
manner that would violate the provisions of this section.
(4) Local governmental entities responsible for land use planning and
zoning shall ensure compliance with this section when considering any zoning
permit application, zoning designation, or zoning redesignation that would
allow or permit a homeless shelter. A local governmental entity may impose
additional reasonable conditions to mitigate impacts on nearby residential
neighborhoods or commercial uses, or both, including but not limited to re-


quirements for internal and external security measures, operational stan-
dards, and community engagement plans.
(5) If a permit application, zoning designation, or zoning redesigna-
tion that would allow or permit the establishment of a homeless shelter on
a specific parcel of property is denied, approved but overturned on appeal,
approved but not completed, or withdrawn, no new application, designation,
or redesignation for a homeless shelter on the same parcel shall be accepted
for a period of ten (10) years from the filing date of the previous applica-
tion.
(6) A landowner or organization may apply for an exemption from the re-
strictions set forth in this section by securing signed affidavits of ap-
proval from two-thirds (2/3) of property owners within three hundred (300)
feet of the proposed homeless shelter site. The local governing body shall
verify the authenticity of the affidavits and review the exemption request
before granting approval. If the signatures on the affidavits are confirmed
to be valid, the landowner or organization shall be granted an exemption from
the siting restrictions imposed by this section. A homeless shelter granted
an exemption from the provisions of this section must comply with all other
applicable local requirements. An exemption granted pursuant to this sub-
section alone is not presumptive evidence that no impacts will occur without
additional substantiating data and mitigation measures.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.